test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-kalved_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kalveđ: # checked

    kalveđ+V+Inf: kalveđ
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: kolvuđ
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolvuum
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kolvuuh
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalvoo
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalvojeen
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kolvuuvettee
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kolvuv
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kolvup
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kolvuuvetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalvojeh
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalvojim
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kalvojih
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kolvui
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kolvuim
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kolvuid
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kolvuin
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kolvuim
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kolvuid
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kalvojii
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kolvuuččim
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kolvuuččih
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kolvuuččij
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kolvuuččáim
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kolvuuččáid
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kolvuuččáin
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kolvuuččijm
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kolvuuččijd
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kolvuuččii
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kolvuužeem
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kolvuužeeh
#    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kolvuš
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kolvuužeen
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kolvušvettee
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kolvuužává
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kolvuužep
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kolvušvetteđ
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kolvuužeh
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kolvuu
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kolvum
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kolvuuččii
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kolvuužii
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: [kalvojeijee, kalvojijjee]
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: [kolvum, koolvum] #Lene added koolvum
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: kolvum
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: kolvuumin
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: kolvuumist
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: kolvuumân
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ger: kolvuudijn
    kalveđ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: kolvuuhánnáá
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvedâm
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kalvedah
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalveed
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalvedeen
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalveedvettee
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalvedává
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalvedeh
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kalveed
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalvedim
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kalvedij
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kalvedii
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kalvediččim
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kalvedičij
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kalvedižžeem
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kalvediš
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kalveed
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kalvedâm
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kalvedižžii
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: kalvedâm
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: kalveedhánnáá
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: kalvedem
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: kalveedmân
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: kalveedmin
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: kalveedmist
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: kalveeddijn
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: kalveeddijnân
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: kalveeddijnâd
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: kalveeddijnis
    kalveđ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: kalveeddijn
    kalveđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvestâm
    kalveđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvettâm
    kalveđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalveškuáđám
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: kalveliđ
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kalvelâm
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalvel
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalveleen
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalveleh
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kalvel
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalvelim
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kalvelij
    kalveđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kalvelii
